createYaml/yaml_output/VTA_IND_S.yaml
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaasiwaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigosiiwaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigowaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigoon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoom
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoo
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaanaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiwaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaanaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoo
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiim
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoom
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoo
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiiwag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mawadisaawag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mawadisaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: nimawadisigoosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: nimawadisigoomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: gimawadisigoosiimin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: gimawadisigoomin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimawadisigonaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimawadisigonaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiininaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigoninaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigonaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigosiiminaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigominaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigosiiminaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimawadisigominaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigosiinaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimawadisigonaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiininaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigoninaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigosiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigominaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigosiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimawadisigominaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisisinooninimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimawadisininimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisisinooninaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimawadisininaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishi1siimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimawadishi1mwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaawaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishi1siiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishi1minaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishi1siinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimawadishi1naaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishi1siiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimawadishi1minaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimawadisigobaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimawadisigobaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaasiwaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigosiiwaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigowaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigosiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigobanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigosiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimawadisigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigosiiwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimawadisigowaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigosiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimawadisigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaasiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimawadisigoomwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimawadisigoonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaanaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaasiwaanaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimawadisimaanaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaanaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaanaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaasiwaanaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimawadisimaanaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaanaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: nimawadisigoonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoosiimwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: gimawadisigoomwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: gimawadisigoonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mawadisaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mawadisaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: nimawadisigoosiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: nimawadisigoominaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: gimawadisigoosiiminaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: gimawadisigoominaaban
